Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3311, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 65, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.


2025, Section 3311), is amended to read as follows:


Section 3311. A. There is hereby created a Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training which shall be, and is hereby


declared to be, a governmental law enforcement agency of the State


of Oklahoma this state, body politic and corporate, with powers of


government and with the authority to exercise the rights,


privileges, and functions necessary to ensure the professional


training and continuing education of law enforcement officers in


this state. These rights, privileges, and functions include, but

Req. No. 2506 Page 1


are not limited to, those specified in Sections 3311 through 3311.15


of this title and in the Oklahoma Security Guard and Private


Investigator Act and the Bail Enforcement and Licensing Act. The


Council shall be authorized to require agency employees and the


employees of agency contractors in positions to have access to


Oklahoma Peace Officer records, Oklahoma Security Guard and Private


Investigator records, Bail Enforcement and Licensing Act records, to


be subject to a criminal history search by the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Investigation, as well as be fingerprinted for submission of the


fingerprints through the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation to


the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history


record check. The Council shall be the recipient of the results of


the record check. In accordance with Section 150.9 of Title 74 of


the Oklahoma Statutes, this includes a national criminal history


record with a finger print fingerprint analysis. The Council shall


be composed of thirteen (13) members as follows:


1. The Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, or


designee;


2. The Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and


Dangerous Drugs Control, or designee;


3. The Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation,


or designee;





Req. No. 2506 Page 2


4. One member appointed by the Governor who shall be a law


enforcement administrator representing a tribal law enforcement


agency;


5. One member appointed by the Governor who shall be a chief of


police of a municipality with a population over one hundred thousand


(100,000), as determined by the latest Federal Decennial Census;


6. One member appointed by the Board of Directors of the


Oklahoma Sheriffs’ Association who shall be a sheriff of a county


with a population under twenty-five thousand (25,000), as determined


by the latest Federal Decennial Census;


7. One member appointed by the Oklahoma Association of Chiefs


of Police who shall be a chief of police representing a municipality


with a population over ten thousand (10,000), as determined by the


latest Federal Decennial Census;


8. One member shall be appointed by the Board of Directors of


the Oklahoma Sheriffs’ Association who shall be a sheriff of a


county with a population of twenty-five thousand (25,000) or more,


as determined by the latest Federal Decennial Census;


9. One member appointed by the Board of Directors of the


Fraternal Order of Police who shall have experience as a training


officer;


10. One member appointed by the Chancellor of Higher Education


who shall be a representative of East Central University;



Req. No. 2506 Page 3


11. One member appointed by the Board of Directors of the


Oklahoma Sheriffs and Peace Officers Association who shall be a


full-time law enforcement officer in good standing with CLEET within


a county with a population under fifty thousand (50,000);


12. The President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate


shall appoint one member from a list of three or more nominees


submitted by a statewide organization representing cities and towns


that is exempt from taxation under federal law and designated


pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.,


Section 170(a); and


13. The Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives shall


appoint one member from a list of three or more nominees submitted


by an organization that assists in the establishment of


accreditation standards and training programs for law enforcement


agencies throughout this state.


The Executive Director selected by the Council shall be an ex


officio member of the Council and shall act as Secretary. The


Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training shall select a


chair and vice-chair from among its members. Members of the Council


on Law Enforcement Education and Training shall not receive a salary


for duties performed as members of the Council, but shall be


reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the


performance of Council duties pursuant to the provisions of the


State Travel Reimbursement Act.

Req. No. 2506 Page 4


B. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training is


hereby authorized and directed to:


1. Appoint a larger Advisory Council to discuss problems and


hear recommendations concerning necessary research, minimum


standards, educational needs, and other matters imperative to


upgrading Oklahoma law enforcement to professional status;


2. Promulgate rules with respect to such matters as


certification, revocation, suspension, withdrawal and reinstatement


of certification, minimum courses of study, testing and test scores,


attendance requirements, equipment and facilities, minimum


qualifications for instructors, minimum standards for basic and


advanced in-service courses, and seminars for Oklahoma police and


peace officers;


3. Authorize research, basic and advanced courses, and seminars


to assist in program planning directly and through subcommittees;


4. Authorize additional staff and services necessary for


program expansion;


5. Recommend legislation necessary to upgrade Oklahoma law


enforcement to professional status;


6. Establish policies and regulations concerning the number,


geographic and police unit distribution, and admission requirements


of those receiving tuition or scholarship aid available through the


Council. Such waiver of costs shall be limited to duly appointed



Req. No. 2506 Page 5


members of legally constituted local, county, and state law


enforcement agencies on the basis of educational and financial need;


7. Appoint an Executive Director to direct the staff, inform


the Council of compliance with the provisions of this section, and


perform such other duties imposed on the Council by law. An


Executive Director appointed by the Council must qualify for the


position with a bachelor or higher degree in law enforcement from an


accredited college or university, or a bachelor or higher degree in


a law-enforcement-related subject area, and a minimum of five (5)


years of active law enforcement experience including, but not


limited to, responsibility for enforcement, investigation,


administration, training, or curriculum implementation.


The Executive Director of the Council on Law Enforcement


Education and Training may hire an Assistant Director to perform


such duties as directed by the Executive Director.


The Executive Director of the Council on Law Enforcement


Education and Training may commission CLEET staff as peace officers


for purposes consistent with the duties of CLEET as set out in state


law. The powers and duties conferred on the Executive Director or


any staff member appointed by the Executive Director as a peace


officer shall not limit the powers and duties of other peace


officers of this state or any political subdivision thereof. The


Executive Director or any staff member appointed by the Executive



Req. No. 2506 Page 6


Director as a peace officer may, upon request, assist any federal,


state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency;


8. Enter into contracts and agreements for the payment of


classroom space, food, and lodging expenses as may be necessary for


law enforcement officers attending any official course of


instruction approved or conducted by the Council. Such expenses may


be paid directly to the contracting agency or business


establishment. The food and lodging expenses for each law


enforcement officer shall not exceed the authorized rates as


provided for in the State Travel Reimbursement Act; provided,


however, the Council may provide food and lodging to law enforcement


officials attending any official course of instruction approved or


conducted by the Council rather than paying for the provision of


such food and lodging by an outside contracting agency or business


establishment;


9. a. Certify canine teams, consisting of a dog and a


handler working together as a team, trained to detect:


(1) controlled dangerous substances, or


(2) explosives, explosive materials, explosive


devices, or materials which could be used to


construct an explosive device;,


provided, the dog of a certified canine team shall not


be certified at any time as both a drug dog and a bomb


dog, and any dog of a certified canine team who has

Req. No. 2506 Page 7


been previously certified as either a drug dog or a


bomb dog shall not be eligible at any time to be


certified in the other category.


b. Upon retiring the dog from the service it was


certified to perform, the law enforcement department


that handled the dog shall retain possession of the


dog. The handler shall have first option of adopting


the dog. If that option is not exercised, the law


enforcement department shall provide for its adoption.


Once adopted, the dog shall not be placed back into


active service;


10. Enter into a lease, loan, or other agreement with the


Oklahoma Development Finance Authority or a local public trust for


the purpose of facilitating the financing of a new facility for its


operations and use and pledge, to the extent authorized by law, all


or a portion of its receipts of the assessment penalty herein


referenced for the payment of its obligations under such lease,


loan, or other agreement. It is the intent of the Legislature to


increase the assessment penalty to such a level or appropriate


sufficient monies to the Council on Law Enforcement Education and


Training to make payments on the lease, loan, or other agreement for


the purpose of retiring the bonds to be issued by the Oklahoma


Development Finance Authority or local public trust. Such lease,


loan, or other agreement and the bonds issued to finance such

Req. No. 2506 Page 8


facilities shall not constitute an indebtedness of this state or be


backed by the full faith and credit of this state, and the lease,


loan, or other agreement and the bonds shall contain a statement to


such effect;


11. Accept gifts, bequests, devises, contributions, and grants,


public or private, of real or personal property;


12. Appoint an advisory committee composed of representatives


from security guard and private investigative agencies to advise the


Council concerning necessary research, minimum standards for


licensure, education, and other matters related to licensure of


security guards, security guard agencies, private investigators, and


private investigative agencies;


13. Enter into agreements with individuals, educational


institutions, agencies, and business and tribal entities for


professional services, the use of facilities and supplies, and staff


overtime costs incurred as a result of the user’s requests to


schedule functions after-hours, on weekends, or anytime such


requests extend staff beyond its normal capacity, whereby


contracting individuals, educational institutions, agencies, and


business and tribal entities shall pay a fee to be determined by the


Council by rule. All fees collected pursuant to facilities usage


shall be deposited to the credit of the C.L.E.E.T. Training Center


Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 3311.6 of this title.


All other fees collected pursuant to these agreements shall be

Req. No. 2506 Page 9


deposited to the credit of the Peace Officer Revolving Fund created


pursuant to Section 3311.7 of this title. The Council is authorized


to promulgate emergency rules to effectuate the provisions of this


paragraph;


14. Promulgate rules to establish a state firearms


requalification standard for active peace officers and meet any


requirements imposed on the Council by the federal Law Enforcement


Officers Safety Act of 2004;


15. Set minimal criteria relating to qualifications for chief


of police administrative training pursuant to Section 34-102 of


Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes, assist in developing a course of


training for a Police Chief Administrative School, and approve all


police chief administrative training offered in this state;


16. Appoint a Curriculum Review Board to be composed of six (6)


members as follows:


a. one member shall be selected by the Chancellor for


Higher Education, who possesses a background of


creation and review of curriculum and experience


teaching criminal justice or law enforcement courses,


who shall serve an initial term of one (1) year,


b. one member shall represent a municipal jurisdiction


with a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or more


and who shall be a management-level CLEET-certified



Req. No. 2506 Page 10


training officer, who shall serve an initial term of


two (2) years,


c. one member shall represent a county jurisdiction with


a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or more and


who shall be a management-level CLEET-certified


training officer, who shall serve an initial term of


three (3) years,


d. one member shall represent a municipal jurisdiction


with a population of less than fifty thousand (50,000)


and who shall be a CLEET-certified training officer,


who shall serve an initial term of two (2) years,


e. one member shall represent a county jurisdiction with


a population of less than fifty thousand (50,000) and


who shall be a CLEET-certified training officer, who


shall serve an initial term of one (1) year, and


f. one member selected by the Oklahoma Department of


Career and Technology, who shall have experience in


the creation and review of curriculum as well as


experience in teaching criminal justice or law


enforcement courses, who shall serve an initial term


of three (3) years.


After the initial terms of office, all members shall be


appointed to serve three-year terms. Any member may be reappointed


to serve consecutive terms. Members shall serve without

Req. No. 2506 Page 11


compensation, but may be reimbursed for travel expenses pursuant to


the State Travel Reimbursement Act. The Board shall review and


establish curriculum for all CLEET academies and training courses


pursuant to procedures established by the Council on Law Enforcement


Education and Training;


17. Conduct review and verification of any records relating to


the statutory duties of CLEET;


18. Receive requested reports including investigative reports,


court documents, statements, or other applicable information from


local, county, and state agencies and other agencies for use in


actions where a certification or license issued by CLEET may be


subject to disciplinary or other actions provided by law;


19. Summarily suspend a certification of a peace officer,


without prior notice but otherwise subject to administrative


proceedings, if CLEET finds that the actions of the certified peace


officer may present a danger to the peace officer, the public, a


family or household member, or involve a crime against a minor. A


certified copy of the information or indictment charging such a


crime shall be considered clear and convincing evidence of the


charge; and


20. Approve law enforcement agencies and police departments in


accordance with the following:


a. this section applies only to an entity authorized by


statute or by the Constitution to create a law

Req. No. 2506 Page 12


enforcement agency or police department and


commission, appoint, or employ officers that first


creates or reactivates an inactive law enforcement


agency or police department and first begins to


commission, appoint, or employ officers on or after


November 1, 2011,


b. the entity shall submit to CLEET, a minimum of sixty


(60) days prior to creation of the law enforcement


agency or police department, information regarding:


(1) the need for the law enforcement agency or police


department in the community,


(2) the funding sources for the law enforcement


agency or police department, and proof that no


more than fifty percent (50%) of the funding of


the entity will be derived from ticket revenue or


fines,


(3) the physical resources available to officers,


(4) the physical facilities that the law enforcement


agency or police department will operate


including descriptions of the evidence room,


dispatch area, restroom facilities, and public


area,





Req. No. 2506 Page 13


(5) law enforcement policies of the law enforcement


agency or police department including published


policies on:


(a) use of force,


(b) vehicle pursuit,


(c) mental health,


(d) professional conduct of officers,


(e) domestic abuse,


(f) response to missing persons,


(g) supervision of part-time officers, and


(h) impartial policing,


(6) the administrative structure of the law


enforcement agency or police department,


(7) liability insurance, and


(8) any other information CLEET requires by rule,


c. within sixty (60) days of receiving an entity’s


request, CLEET will forward to the entity by certified


mail, return receipt requested, a letter of


authorization or denial to create a law enforcement


agency or police department and commission, appoint,


or employ officers, signed by the Executive Director


of CLEET, and


d. in cases of denial, the entity may appeal the decision


of the Executive Director to the full CLEET Council.

Req. No. 2506 Page 14


The Executive Director shall ensure that the final


report is provided to all members of the Council. The


Council shall review and make recommendations


concerning the report at the first meeting of the


Council to occur after all members of the Council have


received the report. The Council may, by majority


vote:


(1) order additional information be provided,


(2) order confirmation of the opinion of the


Executive Director, or


(3) order authorization of the entity.


C. 1. Payment of any fee provided for in this section may be


made by a nationally recognized credit or debit card issued to the


applicant. The Council may publicly post and collect a fee for the


acceptance of the nationally recognized credit or debit card not to


exceed five percent (5%) of the amount of the payment. For purposes


of this subsection, “nationally recognized credit card” means any


instrument or device, whether known as a credit card, credit plate,


charge plate, or by any other name, issued with or without fee by an


issuer for the use of the cardholder in obtaining goods, services,


or anything else of value and which is accepted by over one thousand


merchants in this state. “Debit card” means an identification card


or device issued to a person by a business organization which


permits such person to obtain access to or activate a consumer

Req. No. 2506 Page 15


banking electronic facility. The Council shall determine which


nationally recognized credit or debit cards will be accepted as


payment for fees.


2. Payment for any fee provided for in this title may be made


by a business check. The Council may:


a. add an amount equal to the amount of the service


charge incurred, not to exceed three percent (3%) of


the amount of the check as a service charge for the


acceptance and verification of the check, or


b. add an amount of no more than Five Dollars ($5.00) as


a service charge for the acceptance and verification


of a check. For purposes of this subsection,


“business check” shall not mean a money order,


cashier’s check, or bank-certified check.


D. Failure of the Legislature to appropriate necessary funds to


provide for expenses and operations of the Council on Law


Enforcement Education and Training shall not invalidate other


provisions of this section relating to the creation and duties of


the Council.


E. 1. No person shall be eligible for employment as a peace


officer or reserve peace officer until the employing law enforcement


agency has conducted a background investigation of such person


consisting of the following:



Req. No. 2506 Page 16


a. a fingerprint search submitted to the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation with a return report to the


submitting agency that such person has no felony


record,


b. a fingerprint search submitted to the Federal Bureau


of Investigation with a return report to the


submitting agency that such person has no felony


record,


c. such person has undergone psychological evaluation by


a psychologist licensed by the State of Oklahoma and


has been evaluated to be suitable to serve as a peace


officer in the State of Oklahoma this state,


d. the employing agency has verified that such person has


a high school diploma or a GED equivalency certificate


as recognized by state law,


e. such person is not participating in a deferred


sentence agreement for a felony, a crime involving


moral turpitude or a crime of domestic violence, and


does not have any criminal charges pending in any


court in this state, another state, in tribal court,


or pursuant to the United States Code,


f. such person is not currently subject to an order of


the Council revoking, suspending, or accepting a


voluntary surrender of peace officer certification,

Req. No. 2506 Page 17


g. such person is not currently undergoing treatment for


a mental illness, condition, or disorder. For


purposes of this subsection, “currently undergoing


treatment for mental illness, condition, or disorder”


means the person has been diagnosed by a licensed


physician, psychologist, or licensed mental health


professional as being afflicted with a substantial


disorder of thought, mood, perception, psychological


orientation, or memory that significantly impairs


judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or


ability to meet the ordinary demands of life and such


condition continues to exist,


h. such person is twenty-one (21) years of age.


Provided, this requirement shall not affect those


persons who are already employed as a police or peace


officer prior to November 1, 1985, and


i. such person has provided proof of United States


citizenship or resident alien status, pursuant to an


employment eligibility verification form from the


United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.


2. To aid the evaluating psychologist in interpreting the test


results including automated scoring and interpretations, the


employing agency shall provide the psychologist a statement


confirming the identity of the individual taking the test as the

Req. No. 2506 Page 18


person who is employed or seeking employment as a peace officer of


the agency and attesting that it administered the psychological


instrument in accordance with standards within the test document.


The psychologist shall report to the employing agency the evaluation


of the assessment instrument and may include any additional


recommendations to assist the employing agency in determining


whether to certify to the Council on Law Enforcement Education and


Training that the person being evaluated is suitable to serve as a


peace officer in this state. No additional procedures or


requirements shall be imposed for performance of the psychological


evaluation. The psychological instrument utilized shall be


evaluated by a psychologist licensed by the State of Oklahoma, and


the employing agency shall certify to the Council that the


evaluation was conducted in accordance with this provision and that


the employee or applicant is suitable to serve as a peace officer in


this state.


a. Any person found not to be suitable for employment or


certification by the Council shall not be employed,


retained in employment as a peace officer, or


certified by the Council for at least one (1) year, at


which time the employee or applicant may be


reevaluated by a psychologist licensed by the State of


Oklahoma. This section shall also be applicable to


all reserve peace officers in this state.

Req. No. 2506 Page 19


b. Any person who is certified by CLEET and has undergone


the psychological evaluation required by this


subparagraph and has been found to be suitable as a


peace officer shall not be required to be reevaluated


for any subsequent employment as a peace officer


following retirement or any break in service as a


peace officer, unless such break in service exceeds


five (5) years or the Council determines that a peace


officer may present a danger to himself or herself,


the public, or a family or household member.


c. All persons seeking certification shall have their


name, gender, date of birth, and address of such


person submitted to the Department of Mental Health


and Substance Abuse Services by the Council. The


Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services shall respond to the Council within ten (10)


days whether the computerized records of the


Department indicate the applicant has ever been


involuntarily committed to an Oklahoma state mental


institution. In the event that the Department of


Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services reports to


the Council that the applicant has been involuntarily


committed, the Council shall immediately inform the


employing agency.

Req. No. 2506 Page 20


All basic police courses shall include a minimum of four (4)


hours of education and training in recognizing and managing a person


appearing to require mental health treatment or services. The


training shall include training in crime and drug prevention, crisis


intervention, youth and family intervention techniques, recognizing,


investigating and preventing abuse and exploitation of elderly


persons, mental health issues, and criminal jurisdiction on


Sovereign Indian Land.


Subject to the availability of funding, for full-time salaried


police or peace officers a basic police course academy shall consist


of a minimum of six hundred (600) hours.


For reserve deputies a basic reserve academy shall consist of a


minimum of two hundred forty (240) hours.


3. a. Beginning January 1, 2018, any reserve peace officer


who has completed the two-hundred-forty-hour reserve


peace officer certification program and who has been


in active service in that capacity for the past six


(6) months shall be eligible to attend a three-


hundred-sixty-hour basic full-time training academy to


become certified as a full-time peace or police


officer.


b. Beginning January 1, 2027, a reserve peace officer who


has completed the two-hundred-forty-hour reserve peace


officer certification program and is hired as a full-

Req. No. 2506 Page 21


time peace or police officer within two (2) years of


receiving his or her reserve peace officer


certification, shall be eligible to be certified as a


full-time peace or police officer upon completion of


the full law enforcement driver training program


required for certification as a full-time peace or


police officer.


4. Every person who has not been certified as a police or peace


officer and is duly appointed or elected as a police or peace


officer shall hold such position on a temporary basis only, and


shall, within six (6) months from the date of appointment or taking


office, qualify as required in this subsection or forfeit such


position. In computing the time for qualification, all service


shall be cumulative from date of first appointment or taking office


as a police or peace officer with any department in this state.


a. The Council may extend the time requirement specified


in this paragraph for good cause as determined by the


Council.


b. A duty is hereby imposed upon the employing agency to


withhold payment of the compensation or wage of such


unqualified officer.


c. If the police or peace officer fails to forfeit the


position or the employing agency fails to require the


officer to forfeit the position, the district attorney

Req. No. 2506 Page 22


shall file the proper action to cause the forfeiting


of such position. The district court of the county


where the officer is employed shall have jurisdiction


to hear the case.


5. The Council may certify officers who have completed a course


of study in another state deemed by the Council to meet standards


for Oklahoma peace officers providing the officer’s certification in


the other state has not been revoked or voluntarily surrendered and


is not currently under suspension.


6. For purposes of this section, a police or peace officer is


defined as a full-time duly appointed or elected officer who is paid


for working more than twenty-five (25) hours per week and whose


duties are to preserve the public peace, protect life and property,


prevent crime, serve warrants, transport prisoners, and enforce laws


and ordinances of this state, or any political subdivision thereof;


provided, elected sheriffs and their deputies and elected,


appointed, or acting chiefs of police shall meet the requirements of


this subsection within the first six (6) months after assuming the


duties of the office to which they are elected or appointed or for


which they are an acting chief; provided further, that this section


shall not apply to persons designated by the Director of the


Department of Corrections as peace officers pursuant to Section 510


of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.



Req. No. 2506 Page 23


F. No person shall be certified as a police or peace officer by


the Council or be employed by the state, a county, a city, or any


political subdivision thereof, who is currently subject to an order


of the Council revoking, suspending, or accepting a voluntary


surrender of peace officer certification or who has been convicted


of a felony, a crime involving moral turpitude, or a crime of


domestic violence, unless a full pardon has been granted by the


proper agency; however, any person who has been trained and


certified by the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training


and is actively employed as a full-time peace officer as of November


1, 1985, shall not be subject to the provisions of this subsection


for convictions occurring prior to November 1, 1985.


G. 1. The Council is hereby authorized to provide to any


employing agency the following information regarding a person who is


or has applied for employment as a police or peace officer of such


employing agency:


a. Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation and Federal


Bureau of Investigation reports,


b. administration of the psychological tests provided for


herein,


c. performance in the course of study or other basis of


certification,


d. previous certifications issued, and



Req. No. 2506 Page 24


e. any administrative or judicial determination denying


certification.


2. An employing agency shall not be liable in any action


arising out of the release of contents of personnel information


relevant to the qualifications or ability of a person to perform the


duties of a police or peace officer when such information is


released pursuant to written authorization for release of


information signed by such person and is provided to another


employing agency which has employed or has received an application


for employment from such person.


3. As used in this subsection, “employing agency” means a


political subdivision or law enforcement agency which either has


employed or received an employment application from a person who, if


employed, would be subject to this section.


H. 1. A law enforcement agency employing police or peace


officers in this state shall report the hiring, resignation, or


termination for any reason of a police or peace officer to the


Council within ten (10) days. Failure to comply with the provisions


of this subsection may disqualify a law enforcement agency from


participating in training programs sponsored by the Council. Every


law enforcement agency employing police or peace officers in this


state shall submit to CLEET on or before October 1 of each calendar


year a complete list of all commissioned employees with a current


mailing address and phone number for each such employee. In

Req. No. 2506 Page 25


addition to the above, CLEET may impose an administrative fine for


violations of this section.


2. A tribal law enforcement agency that has peace officers


commissioned by an Oklahoma law enforcement agency pursuant to a


cross-deputization agreement with the State of Oklahoma or any


political subdivision of the State of Oklahoma pursuant to the


provisions of Section 1221 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes


shall report the commissioning, resignation, or termination of


commission for any reason of a cross-deputized tribal police or


peace officer to CLEET within ten (10) days of the commissioning,


resignation, or termination. Failure to comply with the provisions


of this subsection may disqualify a tribal law enforcement agency


from participating in training programs sponsored by the Council.


I. It is unlawful for any person to willfully make any


statement in an application to CLEET knowing the statement is false


or intentionally commit fraud in any application to the Council for


attendance in any CLEET-conducted or CLEET-approved peace officer


academy or Collegiate Officer Program or for the purpose of


obtaining peace officer certification or reinstatement. It is


unlawful for any person to willfully submit false or fraudulent


documents relating to continuing education rosters, transcripts or


certificates, or any canine license application. Any person


convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a


felony punishable by imprisonment in the Department of Corrections

Req. No. 2506 Page 26


for a term of not less than two (2) years nor more than five (5)


years, or by a fine not exceeding Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00),


or by both such fine and imprisonment. In addition to the above,


CLEET may impose an administrative fine.


J. 1. A police or peace officer shall be subject to


disciplinary action to include a denial, suspension, revocation, or


acceptance of voluntary surrender of peace officer certification


upon a showing of clear and convincing evidence for the following:


a. conviction of a felony or a crime of domestic


violence,


b. conviction of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;


provided, if the conviction is a single isolated


incident that occurred more than five (5) years ago


and the Council is satisfied that the person has been


sufficiently rehabilitated, the Council may, in its


discretion, certify such person providing that all


other statutory requirements have been met,


c. a verdict of guilt or entry of a plea of guilty or


nolo contendere or an “Alford” plea or any plea other


than a not guilty plea for a felony offense, a crime


of moral turpitude, or a crime of domestic violence,


d. falsification or a willful misrepresentation of


information in an employment application or


application to the Council on Law Enforcement

Req. No. 2506 Page 27


Education and Training, records of evidence, or in


testimony under oath,


e. revocation or voluntary surrender of police or peace


officer certification in another state for a violation


of any law or rule or in settlement of any


disciplinary action in such state,


f. involuntary commitment of a reserve or peace officer


in a mental institution or licensed private mental


health facility for any mental illness, condition or


disorder that is diagnosed by a licensed physician,


psychologist or a licensed mental health professional


as a substantial disorder of thought, mood,


perception, psychological orientation, or memory that


significantly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to


recognize reality, or ability to meet the ordinary


demands of life. Provided, the peace officer


certification may be reinstated upon the Council


receiving notification of a psychological evaluation


conducted by a licensed physician, psychologist or


licensed mental health professional which attests and


states by affidavit that the officer and the


evaluation test data of the officer have been examined


and that, in the professional opinion of the


physician, psychologist or licensed mental health

Req. No. 2506 Page 28


professional, the officer is psychologically suitable


to return to duty as a peace officer. Notwithstanding


any other provision of state law pertaining to


confidentiality of hospital or other medical records,


and as allowable under federal law, CLEET may subpoena


or request a court to subpoena records necessary to


assure compliance with these provisions. Any


confidential information received by CLEET for such


purpose shall retain its confidential character while


in the possession of CLEET,


g. abuse of office,


h. entry of a final order of protection against applicant


or officer, or


i. any violation of the Oklahoma Private Security


Licensing Act.


2. Disciplinary proceedings shall be commenced by filing a


complaint with the Council on a form approved by the Council. Any


employing agency or other person having information may submit such


information to the Council for consideration as provided in this


subsection.


3. Upon the filing of the complaint, a preliminary


investigation shall be conducted to determine whether:





Req. No. 2506 Page 29


a. there is reason to believe the person has violated any


provision of this subsection or any other provision of


law or rule, or


b. there is reason to believe the person has been


convicted of a felony, a crime involving moral


turpitude or a domestic violence offense or is


currently participating in a deferred sentence for


such offenses.


4. When the investigation of a complaint does not find the


person has violated any of the provisions of this subsection, or


finds that the person is sufficiently rehabilitated as provided in


subparagraph b or f of paragraph 1 of this subsection, no


disciplinary action shall be required and the person shall remain


certified as a police or peace officer. When the investigation of a


complaint finds that the person has violated any of the provisions


of this subsection, the matter shall be referred for disciplinary


proceedings. The disciplinary proceedings shall be in accordance


with Articles I and II of the Administrative Procedures Act.


5. The Council shall revoke the certification of any person


upon determining that such person has been convicted of a felony or


a crime involving moral turpitude or a domestic violence offense or


has entered a plea of guilty, or nolo contendere or an “Alford” plea


or any plea other than a not guilty plea for a felony offense, a


crime of moral turpitude or a crime of domestic violence or is the

Req. No. 2506 Page 30


respondent in a final victim protective order; provided, that if the


conviction has been reversed, vacated or otherwise invalidated by an


appellate court, such conviction shall not be the basis for


revocation of certification; provided further, that any person who


has been trained and certified by the Council on Law Enforcement


Education and Training and is actively employed as a full-time peace


officer as of November 1, 1985, shall not be subject to the


provisions of this subsection for convictions occurring prior to


November 1, 1985. The sole issue to be determined at the hearing


shall be whether the person has been convicted of a felony, a crime


involving moral turpitude or a domestic violence offense or is the


named respondent/defendant in a final victim protective order.


6. The Council shall revoke the certification of any person


upon determining that such person has received a deferred sentence


for a felony, a crime involving moral turpitude or a domestic


violence offense.


7. The Council may suspend the certification of any person upon


a determination that such person has been involuntarily committed to


a mental institution or mental health facility for a mental illness,


condition or disorder as provided in subparagraph f of paragraph 1


of this subsection.


8. Every law enforcement agency in this state shall, within


thirty (30) days of a final order of termination or resignation


while under investigation of a CLEET-certified peace officer, report

Req. No. 2506 Page 31


such order or resignation in writing to the Executive Director of


the Council. Any report, upon receipt by the Council, shall be


considered as personnel records and shall be afforded confidential


protection pursuant to Sections 24A.7 and 24A.8 of Title 51 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. Any medical or other confidential records


obtained by subpoena pursuant to this subsection shall not be made a


part of such report. The Executive Director shall ensure that the


report is provided to all members of the Council. The Council shall


review and make recommendations concerning the report at the first


meeting of the Council to occur after all members of the Council


have received the report. The Council may, by a majority vote,


order the suspension, for a given period of time, or revocation of


the CLEET certification of the peace officer in question if there


are grounds for such actions pursuant to this section and the peace


officer in question has been provided with notice and an opportunity


for a hearing pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.


Suspension or revocation of CLEET certification pursuant to this


paragraph shall be reported to the district attorney for the


jurisdiction in which the peace officer was employed, to the


liability insurance company of the law enforcement agency that


employed the peace officer, the chief elected official of the


governing body of the law enforcement agency and the chief law


enforcement officer of the law enforcement agency.



Req. No. 2506 Page 32


9. For all other violations of this subsection, the hearing


examiner shall take into consideration the severity of the


violation, any mitigating circumstances offered by the person


subject to disciplinary action, and any other evidence relevant to


the person’s character to determine the appropriate disciplinary


action.


10. a. A police or peace officer may voluntarily surrender


and relinquish the peace officer certification to


CLEET. Pursuant to such surrender or relinquishment,


the person surrendering the certification shall be


prohibited from applying to CLEET for reinstatement


within five (5) years of the date of the surrender or


relinquishment, unless otherwise provided by law for


reinstatement.


b. No person who has had a police or peace officer


certification from another state revoked or


voluntarily surrendered and has not been reinstated by


that state shall be considered for certification by


CLEET.


c. Any person seeking reinstatement of police or peace


officer certification which has been suspended,


revoked, or voluntarily surrendered may apply for


reinstatement pursuant to promulgated CLEET rules


governing reinstatement. Except as provided in this

Req. No. 2506 Page 33


subsection, any person whose certification has been


revoked, suspended or voluntarily surrendered for any


reason including failure to comply with mandatory


education and training requirements, shall pay a


reinstatement fee of One Hundred Fifty Dollars


($150.00) to be deposited to the credit of the Peace


Officer Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section


3311.7 of this title.


11. A duty is hereby imposed upon the district attorney who, on


behalf of the State of Oklahoma, prosecutes a person holding police


or peace officer or reserve peace officer certification for a


felony, a crime involving moral turpitude, or a crime of domestic


violence in which a plea of guilty, nolo contendere, or an “Alford”


plea or any other plea other than a not guilty plea or other finding


of guilt is entered by, against or on behalf of a certified police


or peace officer to report such plea, agreement, or other finding of


guilt to the Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training


within ten (10) days of such plea agreement or the finding of guilt.


12. Any person or agency required or authorized to submit


information pursuant to this section to the Council shall be immune


from liability arising from the submission of the information as


long as the information was submitted in good faith and without


malice.



Req. No. 2506 Page 34


13. Any peace officer employed by a law enforcement agency in


this state which has internal discipline policies and procedures on


file with CLEET shall be exempt from the disciplinary proceedings


and actions provided for in this subsection; provided, however, such


exemption shall not apply if the peace officer has been convicted of


a felony crime, a crime of moral turpitude, or a crime of domestic


violence.


14. All criminal proceedings initiated against a CLEET-


certified peace officer or reserve peace officer shall be reported


by the officer to CLEET immediately after arrest or discovery of the


filing of such criminal proceeding. All CLEET-certified peace


officers and reserve peace officers shall be required to report when


a victim protective order has been issued against the officer


including orders issued on an emergency basis and all final orders


of protection. Failure to give notice pursuant to the provisions of


this paragraph may be cause to initiate an action against the


officer by CLEET.


15. As used in this subsection:


a. “law enforcement agency” means any department or


agency of the state, a county, a municipality, or


political subdivision thereof, with the duties to


maintain public order, make arrests, and enforce the


criminal laws of this state or municipal ordinances,


which employs CLEET-certified personnel,

Req. No. 2506 Page 35


b. “final order of termination” means a final notice of


dismissal from employment provided after all


grievance, arbitration, and court actions have been


completed, and


c. “resignation while under investigation” means the


resignation from employment of a peace officer who is


under investigation for any felony violation of law, a


crime of moral turpitude, a crime of domestic


violence, or the resignation from employment of a


peace officer as part of an arbitration or plea


agreement.


K. 1. Every canine team in the state trained to detect


controlled dangerous substances shall be certified, by test, in the


detection of such controlled dangerous substances and shall be


recertified annually so long as the canine is used for such


detection purposes. The certification test and annual


recertification test provisions of this subsection shall not be


applicable to canines that are owned by a law enforcement agency and


that are certified and annually recertified in the detection of


controlled dangerous substances by the United States Customs


Service. No employee of CLEET may be involved in the training or


testing of a canine team.


2. The Council shall appoint a Drug Dog Advisory Council to


make recommendations concerning minimum standards, educational

Req. No. 2506 Page 36


needs, and other matters imperative to the certification of canines


and canine teams trained to detect controlled dangerous substances.


The Council shall promulgate rules based upon the recommendations of


the Advisory Council. Members of the Advisory Council shall


include, but need not be limited to, a commissioned officer with


practical knowledge of such canines and canine teams from each of


the following:


a. the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous


Drugs Control,


b. the Department of Public Safety,


c. a police department,


d. a sheriff’s office, and


e. a university or college campus police department.


3. The fee for the certification test shall be Two Hundred


Dollars ($200.00) and the annual recertification test fee shall be


One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per canine team. A retest fee of


Fifty Dollars ($50.00) will be charged if the team fails the test.


No such fee shall be charged to any local, state or federal


government agency. The fees provided for in this paragraph shall be


deposited to the credit of the CLEET Fund created pursuant to


Section 1313.2 of Title 20 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


L. 1. Every canine team in the state trained to detect


explosives, explosive materials, explosive devices, and materials


which could be used to construct an explosive device shall be

Req. No. 2506 Page 37


certified, by test, in the detection of such explosives and


materials and shall be recertified annually so long as the canine is


used for such detection purposes. The certification test and annual


recertification test provisions of this subsection shall not be


applicable to canines that are owned by a law enforcement agency if


such canines are certified and annually recertified in the detection


of explosives and materials by the United States Department of


Defense. No employee of CLEET may be involved in the training or


testing of a canine team.


2. The Council shall appoint a Bomb Dog Advisory Council to


make recommendations concerning minimum standards, educational


needs, and other matters imperative to the certification of canines


and canine teams trained to detect explosives, explosive materials,


explosive devices and materials which could be used to construct an


explosive device. The Council shall promulgate rules based upon the


recommendations of the Advisory Council. Members of the Advisory


Council shall include, but need not be limited to, a commissioned


officer with practical knowledge of such canines and canine teams


from each of the following:


a. the Department of Public Safety,


b. a police department,


c. a sheriff’s office, and


d. a university or college campus police department.



Req. No. 2506 Page 38


3. The fee for the certification test shall be Two Hundred


Dollars ($200.00) and the annual recertification test fee shall be


One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per canine team. A retest fee of


Fifty Dollars ($50.00) will be charged if the team fails the test.


No such fee shall be charged to any local, state or federal


government agency. The fees provided for in this paragraph shall be


deposited to the credit of the CLEET Fund created pursuant to


Section 1313.2 of Title 20 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


M. All tribal police officers of any Indian tribe or nation who


have been commissioned by an Oklahoma law enforcement agency


pursuant to a cross-deputization agreement with the State of


Oklahoma or any political subdivision of the State of Oklahoma


pursuant to the provisions of Section 1221 of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes shall be eligible for peace officer certification


under the same terms and conditions required of members of the law


enforcement agencies of the State of Oklahoma and its political


subdivisions. CLEET shall issue peace officer certification to


tribal police officers who, as of July 1, 2003, are commissioned by


an Oklahoma law enforcement agency pursuant to a cross-deputization


agreement with the State of Oklahoma or any political subdivision of


the State of Oklahoma pursuant to the provisions of Section 1221 of


Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes and have met the training and


qualification requirements of this section.



Req. No. 2506 Page 39


N. If an employing law enforcement agency in this state has


paid for CLEET training and the salary of a person while that person


is completing in this state a basic police course approved by the


Council and if within one (1) year after the date the person is


commissioned with the law enforcement agency that person resigns and


is hired by another law enforcement agency in this state, the second


law enforcement agency or the person receiving the training shall


reimburse the original employing law enforcement agency for the cost


of CLEET training and salary paid to the person while completing the


basic police course by the original employing law enforcement


agency. If the person leaves the original employing law enforcement


agency later than one (l) year, but less than two (2) years, after


the date the person is commissioned with the law enforcement agency,


the second law enforcement agency or the person receiving the


training shall reimburse the original employing law enforcement


agency fifty percent (50%) of the cost of CLEET training and salary


paid to the person while completing the basic police course by the


original employing law enforcement agency. CLEET shall not be a


party to any court action based on this provision.


O. The Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training, in


its discretion, may waive all or part of any moneys due to the


Council, if deemed uncollectable by the Council.


P. Peace officers, reserve peace officers, tribal peace


officers, agencies, bail enforcers, security guards and private

Req. No. 2506 Page 40


investigators shall maintain with the Council current mailing


addresses and shall notify the Council, in writing, of any change of


address or name. Notification of change of name shall require


certified copies of any marriage license or other court document


which reflects the change of name. Notice of change of address or


telephone number must be made within ten (10) days of the effected


change. Notices shall not be accepted over the phone. In any


proceeding in which the Council is required to serve notice or an


order on an individual or an agency, the Council may send a letter


to the mailing address on file with the Council. If the letter is


returned and a notation of the U.S. Postal Service indicates


“unclaimed”, or “moved”, or “refused” or any other nondelivery


markings and the records of the Council indicate that no change of


address as required by this subsection has been received by the


Council, the notice and any subsequent notices or orders shall be


deemed by the Court as having been legally served for all purposes.


Q. All CLEET records of bail enforcers may be released only in


compliance with this section and the Bail Enforcement and Licensing


Act. All records in CLEET possession concerning other persons or


entities shall be released only in compliance with this section and


the Oklahoma Open Records Act.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2506 CN 1/14/2026 10:53:36 AM

Req. No. 2506 Page 41